West Virginia, session 2026, HB4416.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 8. LEVIES. §11-8-5a. Classification of forestry property for levy purposes. (a) The purpose of this section is to support West Virginia's forestry industry by classifying forestry equipment as Class I property, recognizing forestry as a component of agriculture essential to the state's economy.(b) For the purposes of property tax classification under §11-8-5 of this code and consistent with Article X, Section 1 of the West Virginia Constitution, forestry equipment primarily used in the harvesting, processing, or transportation of forest products shall be considered personal property employed exclusively in agriculture and classified as Class I property: Provided, That the equipment is owned by the producer of the forest products.(c) Forestry equipment shall include, but not be limited to:(1) Skidders, feller-bunchers, forwarders, cable yarders, forestry processors, dozers, and loaders; and (2) Trailers and other machinery.(d) For purposes of this article, forestry equipment may not include any vehicles which would not qualify for a farm use exemption certificate pursuant to §17A-3-2 of this code.(e) This section shall take effect on July 1, 2026. ARTICLE 15. CONSUMERS SALES AND SERVICE TAX. §11-15-8e. Forestry Equipment. Effective July 1, 2026, the provisions of this article shall not apply to the sales and service of forestry equipment as defined in §11-8-5a of this code.The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home